el: Υγεία & ομορφιά > Φροντίδα υγείας > Βοηθήματα ακοής: Ακουστικά βαρηκοΐας πίσω από το αυτί (BTE); Φορητά ακουστικά βαρηκοΐας σώματος; Ακουστικά βαρηκοΐας αγκυρωμένα στο οστό (BAHA); Ακουστικά βαρηκοΐας πλήρως στον ακουστικό πόρο (CIC); Ακουστικά βαρηκοΐας πλήρους καλύμματος στο αυτί (FSITE); Ακουστικά βαρηκοΐας ημι-καλύμματος στο αυτί (HSITE); Ακουστικά βαρηκοΐας μέσα στον ακουστικό πόρο (ITC); Ακουστικά βαρηκοΐας μέσα στο αυτί (ITE); Αόρατα ακουστικά βαρηκοΐας στον ακουστικό πόρο (IIC); Μίνι ακουστικά βαρηκοΐας πίσω από το αυτί (mBTE); Ακουστικά βαρηκοΐας RIC
lt-LT: Sveikata ir grožis > Sveikatos priežiūra > Klausos aparatai: Už ausies nešiojami klausos aparatai; Ant kūno nešiojami klausos aparatai; Prie kaulo tvirtinami klausos aparatai; Visiškai į ausies kanalą įvedami klausos aparatai; Viso apvalkalo į ausį įdedami klausos aparatai; Pusinio apvalkalo į ausį įdedami klausos aparatai; Į ausies kanalą įvedami klausos aparatai; Į ausį įdedami klausos aparatai; Nematomi į kanalą įvedami klausos aparatai; Miniatiūriniai už ausies nešiojami klausos aparatai; Už ausies dedami (RIC) klausos aparatai
de: Gesundheit & Schönheit > Gesundheitspflege > Hörhilfen: Hinter-dem-Ohr-Hörgeräte (HdO); Am Körper getragene Hörgeräte; Knochenverankerte Hörgeräte (BAHA); Komplett-im-Gehörgang-Hörgeräte (CIC); Vollschalen-Im-Ohr-Hörgeräte (FSITE); Halbschalen-Im-Ohr-Hörgeräte (HSITE); Im-Gehörgang-Hörgeräte (ITC); Im-Ohr-Hörgeräte (ITE); Fast unsichtbare Hörgeräte (IIC); Mini-Hinter-dem-Ohr-Hörgeräte (Mini-HdO); Hörer-im-Ohr (RIC)-Hörgeräte
hu: Egészség és szépség > Egészségügyi ellátás > Hallókészülékek: Fül mögötti (BTE) hallókészülékek; Testen viselhető hallókészülékek; Csontra rögzített hallókészülékek (BAHA); Teljesen a csatornán belüli (CIC) hallókészülékek; Teljesen fülbe illeszkedő (FSITE) hallókészülékek; Félig fülbe illeszkedő (FSITE) hallókészülékek; Csatornán belüli (ITC) hallókészülékek; Fülön belüli (ITE) hallókészülékek; Csatornában lévő láthatatlan (IIC) hallókészülékek; Mini fül mögötti (mBTE) hallókészülékek; Hallójárati vevőkészülékek (RIC)
hr-HR: Zdravlje i ljepota > Briga za zdravlje > Slušna pomagala: Zaušna (BTE) slušna pomagala; Slušna pomagala koja se nose na tijelu; Slušna pomagala usidrena u kosti (BAHA); Potpuno unutarkanalna (CIC) slušna pomagala; Slušna pomagala u uhu za cijelu ušku (FSITE).; Slušna pomagala u uhu za pola uške (HSITE).; Slušna pomagala u kanalu (ITC); Slušna pomagala u uhu (ITE); Nevidljiva unutarkanalna slušna pomagala (IIC); Mini zaušna (mBTE) slušna pomagala; Slušni aparati s prijemnikom u kanalu (RIC)
fr: Santé et beauté > Santé > Aides auditives: Aides auditives contour d’oreille (BTE); Aides auditives portées sur le corps; Aides auditives à implant osseux (BAHA); Aides auditives intra-conduit (CIC); Aides auditives intra-auriculaires à coque intégrale (FSITE); Aides auditives intra-auriculaires demi-coque (HSITE); Aides auditives intra-conduit (ITC); Aides auditives intra-auriculaires (ITE); Aides auditives invisibles intra-conduit (IIC); Mini aides auditives contour d’oreille (mBTE); Aides auditives RIC (écouteur déporté dans le conduit)
pt-PT: Saúde e beleza > Cuidados de saúde > Auxiliares de audição: Aparelhos auditivos retroauriculares (BTE); Aparelhos auditivos usados no corpo; Aparelho auditivo ancorado no osso (BAHA); Aparelhos auditivos dentro do canal (CIC); Aparelhos auditivos intra-auriculares de invólucro completo (FSITE); Aparelhos auditivos intra-auriculares de meio invólucro (FSITE); Aparelhos auditivos intracanal (ITC); Aparelhos auditivos intra-auriculares (ITE); Aparelhos auditivos invisíveis intracanal (IIC); Mini aparelhos auditivos retroauriculares (mBTE); Aparelhos auditivos RIC (recetor no canal)
nl: Gezondheid en persoonlijke verzorging > Gezondheidszorg > Gehoorapparaten: Achter-het-oor (AHO) gehoorapparaten; Op het lichaam gedragen gehoorapparaten; Botverankerde gehoorapparaten (BAHA); Completely-in-canal (CIC) gehoorapparaten; Volledig-in-de-oorschelp (FSITE) gehoorapparaten; Half-in-de-oorschelp (HSITE) gehoorapparaten; In-the-canal (ITC) gehoorapparaten; In-het-oor (IHO) gehoorapparaten; Invisible-in-canal (IIC) gehoorapparaten; Mini achter-het-oor (mAHO) gehoorapparaten; Receiver-in-canal (RIC) hoortoestellen
en: Health & Beauty > Health Care > Hearing Aids: Behind-The-Ear (BTE) Hearing Aids; Body-Worn Hearing Aids; Bone-Anchored Hearing Aids (BAHA); Completely-In-Canal (CIC) Hearing Aids; Full-Shell In-the-Ear (FSITE) Hearing Aids; Half-Shell In-the-Ear (HSITE) Hearing Aids; In-The-Canal (ITC) Hearing Aids; In-The-Ear (ITE) Hearing Aids; Invisible-In-Canal (IIC) Hearing Aids; Mini Behind-The-Ear (mBTE) Hearing Aids; Receiver-In-Canal (RIC) Hearing Aids
zh-CN: 保健/美容/卫生/护理 > 医疗保健 > 助听器: 耳背式 (BTE) 助听器; 佩戴式助听器; 骨锚式助听器 (BAHA); 完全耳道式 (CIC) 助听器; 全壳入耳式 (FSITE) 助听器; 半壳入耳式 (HSITE) 助听器; 耳道式 (ITC) 助听器; 入耳式 (ITE) 助听器; 耳道式隐形 (IIC) 助听器; 迷你耳背式 (mBTE) 助听器; 耳道接收式助听器
sl-SI: Zdravje in lepota > Zdravje > Slušni aparati: Zaušesni slušni aparati (BTE); Slušni aparati, ki se nosijo na telesu; Kostno usidrani slušni aparati (BAHA); Sluhovodni slušni aparati (CIC); Slušni aparati s polno školjko (FSITE); Slušni aparati s polovično školjko (HSITE); Slušni aparati v ušesnem kanalu (ITC); Vušesni slušni aparati (ITE); Nevidni slušni aparati v kanalu (IIC); Mini zaušesni slušni aparati (BTE); Slušni aparati z zvočnikom v kanalu (RIC)
tr: Sağlık ve Güzellik > Sağlık Bakım > İşitme Cihazları: Kulak Arkası (BTE) İşitme Cihazları; Vücuda Ekli İşitme Cihazları; Kemiğe Monte İşitme Cihazları (BAHA); Tamamen Kanal İçi (CIC) İşitme Cihazları; Tam Kabuk Kulak İçi (FSITE) İşitme Cihazları; Yarım Kabuk Kulak İçi (HSITE) İşitme Cihazları; Kanal İçi (ITC) İşitme Cihazları; Kulak İçi (ITE) İşitme Cihazları; Görünmez Kanal İçi (IIC) İşitme Cihazları; Mini Kulak Arkası (mBTE) İşitme Cihazları; Kulak İçi Alıcılı (RIC) İşitme Cihazları
nb: Skjønnhet og helse > Helsestell > Hørselshjelp: Høreapparater bak øret (BTE); Kroppsbårne høreapparater; Benankrede høreapparater (BAHA); Høreapparater i kanal (CIC); Full-Shell In-the-Ear (FSITE) høreapparater; Half-Shell In-the-Ear (HSITE) høreapparater; Høreapparater i kanal (ITC); Høreapparater i øret (ITE); Usynlige høreapparater i kanal (IIC); Mini-høreapparater bak øret (mBTE); RIC-høreapparater
th: สุขภาพและความงาม > การดูแลสุขภาพ > อุปกรณ์ช่วยฟัง: เครื่องช่วยฟังแบบหลังใบหู (BTE); เครื่องช่วยฟังแบบสวมใส่ตามร่างกาย; เครื่องช่วยฟังแบบฝังกระดูก (BAHA); เครื่องช่วยฟังแบบพอดีกับช่องหู (CIC); เครื่องช่วยฟังชนิดใส่ในหูแบบเต็มรู (FSITE); เครื่องช่วยฟังชนิดใส่ในหูแบบครึ่งรู (HSITE); เครื่องช่วยฟังแบบใส่ในช่องหู (ITC); เครื่องช่วยฟังชนิดใส่ในหู (ITE); เครื่องช่วยฟังในช่องหูแบบมองไม่เห็น (IIC); เครื่องช่วยฟังแบบหลังใบหูขนาดเล็ก (mBTE); เครื่องช่วยฟังแบบใส่ในหู
pt-BR: Saúde e beleza > Cuidados com a saúde > Aparelhos auditivos: Aparelhos auditivos retroauriculares (BTE); Aparelhos auditivos usados no corpo; Aparelhos auditivos ancorados nos ossos (BAHA); Aparelhos auditivos completamente no canal (CIC); Aparelhos auditivos intra-auriculares de concha inteira (FSITE); Aparelhos auditivos intra-auriculares de meia concha (HSITE); Aparelhos auditivos intra-canal (ITC); Aparelhos auditivos intra-auriculares (ITE); Aparelhos auditivos invisíveis no canal (IIC); Mini aparelhos auditivos retroauriculares (mBTE); Aparelhos auditivos intracanal com receptor (RIC)
fi: Terveys ja kauneus > Terveydenhoito > Kuulolaitteet: Korvantauslaitteet; Kannettavat kuulolaitteet; Luuhun kiinnitettävät kuulolaitteet (BAHA); Korvakäytävälaitteet; Kuuloke korvassa -kuulolaitteet; Kuuloke osittain korvassa -kuulolaitteet; Korvakäytävään asetettavat kuulolaitteet; Korvaan asetettavat kuulolaitteet; Näkymättömät korvakäytävään asetettavat kuulolaitteet; Korvantauslaitteet, minikokoiset; Receiver-In-Canal (RIC) -kuulolaite
bg-BG: Здраве и красота > Грижа за здравето > Слухови апарати: Зад ушни слухови апарати (BTE); Джобни слухови апарати; Слухови апарати с костна проводимост (BAHA); Изцяло вътреканални слухови апарати (CIC); Напълно вътреушни слухови апарати (FSITE); Наполовина вътреушни слухови апарати (HSITE); Вътреканални слухови апарати (ITC); Вътреушни слухови апарати (ITE); Невидими в канала слухови апарати (IIC); Мини задушни слухови апарати (mBTE); Слухови апарати RIC
cs: Zdraví a krása > Zdravotní péče > Naslouchátka: Naslouchátka BTE (Behind-The-Ear); Naslouchátka nošená na těle; Naslouchátka BAHA (Bone-Anchored Hearing Aids); Naslouchátka CIC (Completely-In-Canal); Naslouchátka FSITE (Full-Shell In-the-Ear); Naslouchátka HSITE (Half-Shell In-the-Ear); Naslouchátka ITC (In-The-Canal); Naslouchátka ITE (In-The-Ear); Naslouchátka IIC (Invisible-In-Canal); Naslouchátka mBTE (Mini Behind-The-Ear); Naslouchátka typu Receiver-In-Canal (RIC)
vi: Sức khỏe và sắc đẹp > Chăm sóc sức khỏe > Máy trợ thính: Máy trợ thính đeo sau tai (BTE); Máy trợ thính đeo trên cơ thể; Máy trợ thính gắn vào xương (BAHA); Máy trợ thính hoàn toàn trong ống tai (CIC); Máy trợ thính trong tai nguyên vỏ (FSITE); Máy trợ thính trong tai nửa vỏ (FSITE); Máy trợ thính trong ống tai (ITC); Máy trợ thính trong tai (ITE); Máy trợ thính tàng hình trong ống tai (IIC); Máy trợ thính mini đeo sau tai (BTE); Máy trợ thính RIC (loa trong ống tai)
it: Salute e bellezza > Salute > Apparecchi acustici: Apparecchi acustici retroauricolari (BTE); Apparecchi acustici per corpo; Apparecchi acustici cocleari (BAHA); Apparecchi acustici endoauricolari (CIC); Apparecchi acustici intrauricolari a guscio intero (FSITE); Apparecchi acustici intrauricolari a mezza conchiglia (HSITE); Apparecchi acustici intracanali (ITC); Apparecchi acustici intrauricolari (ITE); Apparecchi acustici invisibili nel canale (IIC); Mini apparecchi acustici retroauricolari (mBTE); Apparecchi acustici ricevitore-nel-canale (RIC)
sk-SK: Zdravie a krása > Starostlivosť o zdravie > Načúvacie prístroje: Načúvacie prístroje typu Behind-The-Ear (BTE); Načúvacie prístroje typu Body-Worn; Načúvacie prístroje typu Bone-Anchored (BAHA); Načúvacie prístroje typu Completely In-Canal (CIC); Načúvacie prístroje typu Full-Shell In-the-Ear (FSITE); Načúvacie prístroje typu Half-Shell In-the-Ear (HSITE); Načúvacie prístroje typu In-The-Canal (ITC); Načúvacie prístroje typu In-The-Ear (ITE); Načúvacie prístroje typu Invisible-In-Canal (IIC); Načúvacie prístroje typu Mini Behind-The-Ear (mBTE); Načúvacie prístroje RIC
pl: Zdrowie i uroda > Opieka zdrowotna > Aparaty słuchowe: Aparaty słuchowe zauszne (BTE); Aparaty słuchowe noszone na ciele; Aparaty słuchowe na przewodnictwo kostne (BAHA); Aparaty słuchowe całkowicie wewnątrzkanałowe (CIC); Wewnątrzuszne aparaty małżowinowe (FSITE); Wewnątrzuszne aparaty półmałżowinowe (HSITE); Aparaty słuchowe wewnątrzkanałowe (ITC); Aparaty słuchowe wewnątrzuszne (ITE); Aparaty słuchowe niewidoczne (IIC); Mini aparaty słuchowe zauszne (mBTE); Aparaty słuchowe RIC (odbiornik w kanale słuchowym)
da: Sundhed og skønhed > Sundhedspleje > Høreapparater: BTE-høreapparater (Behind-The-Ear); Kropsbårne høreapparater; BAHA-høreapparater (Bone-Anchored Hearing Aid); CIC-høreapparater (Completely-In-Canal); FSITE-høreapparater (Full-Shell In-the-Ear); HSITE-høreapparater (Half-Shell In-the-Ear); ITC-høreapparater (In-The-Canal); ITE-høreapparater (In-The-Ear); IIC-høreapparater (Invisible-In-Canal); mBTE-høreapparater (Mini Behind-The-Ear); RIC-høreapparater (receiver-in-canal)
es: Salud y belleza > Cuidado de la salud > Audífonos: Audífonos retroauriculares (BTE); Audífonos corporales; Audífonos anclados al hueso (BAHA); Audífonos completamente en el canal (CIC); Audífonos intrauditivos de carcasa completa (FSITE); Audífonos internos de media carcasa (HSITE); Audífonos dentro del canal (ITC); Audífonos intrauditivos (ITE); Audífonos invisibles en el canal (IIC); Mini audífonos retroauriculares (mBTE); Audífonos con receptor en el canal (RIC)
ja: 美容・健康 > ヘルスケア > 補聴器: 耳かけ型（BTE）補聴器; 首掛け型補聴器; 骨固定型補聴器（BAHA）; 完全耳あな型（CIC）補聴器; フルシェル インザイヤー（FSITE）補聴器; ハーフシェル インザイヤー（HSITE）補聴器; カナル型（ITC）補聴器; インザイヤー（ITE）補聴器; 見えない耳あな型（IIC）補聴器; ミニ耳かけ型（mBTE）補聴器; 耳かけ型（RIC）補聴器
zh-TW: 保健與美容 > 健康照護 > 聽力輔助器: 耳背式 (BTE) 助聽器; 體戴式助聽器; 骨錨式助聽器 (BAHA); 全耳道式 (CIC) 助聽器; 全殼入耳式 (FSITE) 助聽器; 半殼入耳式 (FSITE) 助聽器; 耳道式 (ITC) 助聽器; 入耳式 (ITC) 助聽器; 隱形耳道式 (ITC) 助聽器; 迷你耳背式 (mBTE) 助聽器; 受聲道內助聽器 (RIC)
ko: 건강/미용 > 건강 관리 > 보청기: 귀걸이형(BTE) 보청기; 신체 착용형 보청기; 골전도(BAHA) 보청기; 완전 고막형(CIC) 보청기; 풀쉘 인이어(FSITE) 보청기; 하프쉘 인이어(HSITE) 보청기; 고막형(ITC) 보청기; 인이어(ITE) 보청기; 귓속형(IIC) 보청기; 미니 귀걸이형(mBTE) 보청기; 외이도형(RIC) 보청기
ru: Красота и здоровье > Медицинские товары > Слуховые аппараты: Заушные слуховые аппараты; Слуховые аппараты для ношения на теле; Слуховые аппараты костной проводимости; Глубокие внутриканальные слуховые аппараты; Полнораковинные внутриушные слуховые аппараты; Полураковинные внутриушные слуховые аппараты; Внутриканальные слуховые аппараты; Внутриушные слуховые аппараты; Невидимые внутриканальные слуховые аппараты; Заушные слуховые аппараты в мини-исполнении; Слуховые аппараты с приемником в канале (RIC)
sv: Skönhet och hälsa > Hälsovård > Hörapparater: Hörapparater bakom örat (BTE); Kroppsburna hörapparater; Benförankrade hörapparater (BAHA); Hörapparater helt i kanalen (CIC); Hörapparater komplett i ytterörat (FSITE); Hörapparater halvt i ytterörat (HSITE); Hörapparater i kanalen (ITC); Hörapparater i örat (ITE); Hörapparater osynliga i örat (IIC); Hörapparater mini bakom örat (mBTE); Hörapparater med mottagare i kanalen (RIC)
ro-RO: Sănătate și frumusețe > Îngrijirea sănătății > Aparate auditive: Aparate auditive în spatele urechii (BTE); Aparate auditive purtate pe corp; Aparate auditive ancorate de os (BAHA); Aparate auditive introduse complet în canal (CIC); Aparate auditive corp complet introduse în ureche (FSITE); Aparate auditive semi-corp introduse în ureche (HSITE); Aparate auditive introduse în canal (ITC); Aparate auditive în ureche (ITE); Aparate auditive invizibile introduse în canal (IIC); Aparate auditive mini, după ureche (mBTE); Aparate auditive cu receptor în canal (RIC)